Arkansas, session 2025, HB1857.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 52, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-52-524. Direct payment of tax by consumer-user — New and used
motorboats sold by motorboat dealer — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section, "motorboat" means the same as defined in
§ 27-101-103.
(b)(1)(A) On or before the time for applying for a certificate of
number as prescribed by § 27-101-304, a consumer shall pay to the Secretary
of the Department of Finance and Administration the tax levied by this
chapter and all other gross receipts taxes levied by the state with respect
to the sale by a motorboat dealer of a new or used motorboat required to be
*JLL341*
03/19/2025 1:25:42 PM JLL341

HB1857
numbered in this state.
(B) The tax levied by this chapter or other gross receipts
taxes levied by the state shall not be collected by the motorboat dealer.
(2) The secretary shall require the payment of the taxes at the
time of registration before issuing a certificate of number for the new or
used motorboat.
(3) If the consumer fails to pay the taxes when due:
(A) There is assessed a penalty equal to ten percent (10%)
of the amount of taxes due; and
(B) The consumer shall pay to the secretary the penalty
under subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section and the taxes due before the
secretary issues a certificate of number for the motorboat.
(c)(1)(A) Except as provided in this section, when a used motorboat is
taken in trade as a credit or part payment on the sale of a new or used
motorboat by a motorboat dealer, the tax levied by this chapter and all other
gross receipts taxes levied by the state shall be paid on the net difference
between the total consideration for the new or used motorboat sold and the
credit for the used motorboat taken in trade.
(B)(i) When a used motorboat is sold by a consumer, rather
than traded in as a credit or part payment on the sale of a new or used
motorboat, and the consumer subsequently purchases a new or used motorboat of
greater value from a motorboat dealer within sixty (60) days of the sale, the
tax levied by this chapter and all other gross receipts taxes levied by the
state shall be paid on the net difference between the total consideration for
the new or used motorboat purchased subsequently and the amount received from
the sale of the used motorboat sold in lieu of a trade-in.
(ii)(a) Upon applying for a certificate of number
for the new or used motorboat, a consumer claiming the deduction provided by
subdivision (c)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall provide a bill of sale signed
by all parties to the transaction that reflects the total consideration paid
to the motorboat dealer for the motorboat.
(b) A copy of the bill of sale shall be
deposited with the Department of Finance and Administration at the time of
application for a certificate of number for the new or used motorboat.
(c) The deduction provided by this section
shall not be allowed unless the taxpayer claiming the deduction provides a
03/19/2025 1:25:42 PM JLL341

HB1857
copy of a bill of sale signed by all parties to the transaction that reflects
the total consideration paid to the motorboat dealer for the motorboat.
(iii) If the taxpayer claiming the deduction
provided in this section fails to provide a bill of sale signed by all
parties to the transaction that reflects the total consideration paid to the
motorboat dealer for the motorboat, tax shall be due on the total
consideration paid for the new or used motorboat without any deduction for
the value of the item sold.
(2)(A)(i) When a motorboat dealer removes a motorboat from its
inventory and the motorboat is used by the dealership as a service motorboat,
the dealer shall obtain a certificate of number, register and obtain a
certificate of title, and pay sales tax on the listed retail price of the new
motorboat.
(ii)(a) When the motorboat dealer returns the
service motorboat to inventory as a used motorboat and replaces it with a new
motorboat for dealership use as a service motorboat, the dealer shall pay
sales tax on the difference between the listed retail price of the new
service motorboat to be used by the dealership and the value of the used
service motorboat being returned to inventory.
(b) The value of the used service motorboat
shall be the highest listed wholesale price reflected in the most current
edition of a publication that is generally accepted by the motorboat industry
as providing an accurate valuation of used motorboats.
(B)(i) As used in this subsection, “service motorboat”
means a motorboat driven exclusively by an employee of the dealership and
used either to transport dealership customers or dealership parts and
equipment.
(ii) “Service motorboat” does not include a
motorboat that is rented by the dealership, used as a demonstration
motorboat, or used by a dealership employee for personal use.
(d) All parts and accessories purchased by motorboat dealers for
resale or used by motorboat dealers for the reconditioning or rebuilding of
used motorboats intended for resale are exempt from gross receipts tax,
provided that the motorboat dealer meets the requirements of § 26-52-
401(12)(A) and applicable rules promulgated by the secretary.
(e) This section does not repeal any exemption from this chapter.
03/19/2025 1:25:42 PM JLL341

HB1857
(f) A credit is not allowed for sales or use taxes paid to another
state with respect to the purchase of a motorboat that first obtained a
certificate of number or title by the purchaser in Arkansas.
(g)(1)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (g)(1)(B) of this section,
a motorboat dealer with a permit under § 27-101-302(5) who has purchased a
used motorboat may pay the applicable fees and apply for a certificate of
number for the used motorboat for the sole purpose of obtaining a certificate
of title to the used motorboat without payment of gross receipts tax.
(B)(i) The sale of a motorboat from the original franchise
dealer to any other dealer, person, corporation, or other entity other than a
franchise dealer of the same make of motorboat and which sale is reflected on
the statement of origin shall be subject to gross receipts tax.
(ii) The motorboat shall be considered a used
motorboat that shall have a registered certificate of number and be titled,
and tax shall be paid at the time of application for a certificate of number.
(2) If a certificate of number is issued for a motorboat under §
27-101-302(5)(C), the used motorboat titled by a dealer under this subsection
shall not be operated on the waters of this state unless there is displayed
on the used motorboat the identifying certificate of number issued under §
27-101-302(5)(C).
(h)(1) For purposes of this section, the total consideration for a
used motorboat shall be presumed to be the greater of the actual sales price
as provided on the bill of sale, invoice, or financing agreement or the
average loan value price of the motorboat as listed in the most current
edition of a publication that is generally accepted by the industry as
providing an accurate valuation of used motorboats.
(2) If the published loan value exceeds the invoiced price, the
taxpayer shall establish to the secretary's satisfaction that the price
reflected on the invoice or other document is true and correct.
(3) If the secretary determines that the invoiced price is not
the actual selling price of the motorboat, the total consideration shall be
the published loan value.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 53, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-53-151. Tax on new and used motorboats — Payment and collection —
03/19/2025 1:25:42 PM JLL341

HB1857
Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "motorboat" means the same as defined in
§ 27-101-103.
(b)(1) Upon applying for a certificate of number in this state, a new
or used motorboat sold by a motorboat dealer located outside of the state and
required to be registered with a certificate of number in this state is
subject to the tax levied in this subchapter and all other use taxes levied
by the state.
(2)(A)(i) On or before the time for applying for a certificate
of number as prescribed by § 27-101-304, the applicant for a certificate of
number for the motorboat shall pay the taxes to the Secretary of the
Department of Finance and Administration.
(ii) The tax levied by this chapter or other use
taxes levied by the state shall not be collected by the motorboat dealer.
(B) The secretary shall collect the taxes before issuing a
certificate of number for the motorboat.
(3) If the applicant for a certificate of number for a motorboat
fails to pay the taxes when due:
(A) There is assessed a penalty equal to ten percent (10%)
of the amount of taxes due; and
(B) The person making application for a certificate of
number for a motorboat shall pay to the secretary the penalty under
subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section and the taxes due before the secretary
issues a certificate of number for the motorboat.
(c)(1) When a used motorboat is taken in trade as a credit or part
payment on the sale of a new or used motorboat by a motorboat dealer located
outside of the state, the tax levied in this subchapter and all other use
taxes levied by the state shall be paid on the net difference between the
total consideration for the new or used motorboat sold and the credit for the
used motorboat taken in trade.
(2)(A) When a used motorboat is sold by a consumer, rather than
traded in as a credit or part payment on the sale of a new or used motorboat,
and the consumer subsequently purchases a new or used motorboat of greater
value from a motorboat dealer located outside of the state within sixty (60)
days of the sale, the tax levied by this chapter and all other gross receipts
taxes levied by the state shall be paid on the net difference between the
03/19/2025 1:25:42 PM JLL341

HB1857
total consideration for the new or used motorboat purchased subsequently and
the amount received from the sale of the used motorboat sold in lieu of a
trade-in.
(B)(i) Upon applying for a certificate of number for the
new or used motorboat, a consumer claiming the deduction provided by
subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section shall provide a bill of sale signed by
all parties to the transaction that reflects the total consideration paid to
the motorboat dealer for the motorboat.
(ii) A copy of the bill of sale shall be deposited
with the Department of Finance and Administration at the time of registration
of the new or used motorboat.
(iii) The deduction provided by this subdivision
(c)(2) shall not be allowed unless the taxpayer claiming the deduction
provides a copy of a bill of sale signed by all parties to the transaction
that reflects the total consideration paid to the motorboat dealer for the
motorboat.
(C) If the taxpayer claiming the deduction provided in
this subdivision (c)(2) fails to provide a bill of sale signed by all parties
to the transaction that reflects the total consideration paid to the
motorboat dealer for the motorboat, tax shall be due on the total
consideration paid for the new or used motorboat without any deduction for
the value of the item sold.
(d) The tax imposed by this subchapter does not apply to a motorboat
to be registered by a bona fide nonresident of this state.
(e) This section does not repeal any exemption from this subchapter.
(f)(1) Upon payment of all applicable fees, a motorboat dealer with a
permit under § 27-101-302(5) who has purchased a used motorboat from outside
of the state may apply for a certificate of number for the motorboat for the
sole purpose of obtaining a certificate of title to the vehicle without
payment of use tax.
(2) If a certificate of number is issued for a motorboat under §
27-101-302(5)(C), the used motorboat titled by a dealer under this subsection
shall not be operated on the waters of this state unless there is displayed
on the used motorboat the identifying certificate of number issued under §
27-101-302(5)(C).
(g)(1) For purposes of this section, the total consideration for a
03/19/2025 1:25:42 PM JLL341

HB1857
used motorboat shall be presumed to be the greater of the actual sales price
as provided on a bill of sale, invoice, or financing agreement or the average
loan value of the motorboat as listed in the most current edition of a
publication which is generally accepted by the motorboat industry as
providing an accurate valuation of used motorboats.
(2) If the published loan value exceeds the invoiced price, the
taxpayer shall establish to the secretary's satisfaction that the price
reflected on the invoice or other document is true and correct.
(3) If the secretary determines that the invoiced price is not
the actual selling price of the motorboat, the total consideration shall be
the published loan value.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1 and 2 of this act are effective
on the first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this
act.





















03/19/2025 1:25:42 PM JLL341